Washington statutes.
RCW 36.54.170

County ferry districts—Treasurer—Ferry district fund.

(1) The treasurer of the county in which a ferry district is located shall be treasurer of the district. The county treasurer shall receive and disburse ferry district revenues, collect taxes authorized and levied under this chapter, and credit district revenues to the proper fund.

(2) The county treasurer shall establish a ferry district fund, into which must be paid all district revenues, and the county treasurer shall also maintain such special funds as may be created by the governing body of a ferry district, into which the county treasurer shall place all money as the governing body of the district may, by resolution, direct.

(3) The county treasurer shall pay out money received for the account of the ferry district on warrants issued by the county auditor against the proper funds of the district.

(4) All district funds must be deposited with the county depositaries under the same restrictions, contracts, and security as provided for county depositaries.

(5) All interest collected on ferry district funds belongs to the district and must be deposited to its credit in the proper district funds.

[ 2003 c 83 s 307.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Captions, part headings not law—Severability—Effective date—2003 c 83: See notes following RCW 36.57A.200.